Connecticut, session 2026, HB05422.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Office of Legislative
Management shall, within available resources, contract with a nonprofit
organization that advises state government and industry in the
application of science and engineering to study unidentified aerial
phenomena. In conducting such study, such organization shall consult
with personnel from the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection, the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection,
the Office of Military Affairs and the director of the Connecticut chapter
of the national nonprofit organization dedicated to the investigation of
UFO sightings, abductions and other unexplained phenomena, as
deemed necessary to obtain information. Such study shall include, but
need not be limited to: (1) Benefits of establishing a state center for the
study of unidentified aerial phenomena; and (2) resources necessary to
establish and operate such center. At the conclusion of the study, such
organization shall report the results of the study to the executive
director of the Office of Legislative Management.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, the executive director of the Office of
Legislative Management shall report the results of the study to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5422
matters relating to public safety, the environment, military affairs and
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2